src/fst/stems/prepositions.lexd
LEXICON Prepositions
chi
choq'
cho'q
rochb'een
sa'
ru
re
rik'in

PATTERN Complete_Prepositions
Prepositions [<Prep>:]
[chi<Prep>:chi] [\#] :Set_A [ix<N>:ix] Set_A:
[chi<Prep>:chi] [\#] :Set_A [u<N>:u] Set_A:
[chan<Part>:chan] [\#] :Set_A [u<N>:u] Set_A:
[chi<Prep>:chi] [\#] :Set_A [u<N>:u] Set_A: [:h] Pluralizer #chiruheb'
[rik'in<Prep>:rik'in] Pluralizer #rik'ineb'
